Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-673
Trailer, defined.

Trailer shall mean any vehicle, with or without motive power, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that no part of its weight rests upon the towing vehicle.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 169.